src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON MALLASI-/NUORABUj- !!= * __@CODE@__ joint cont. lexicon
                +Pl+Gen:jd      K          ;
             +Cmp/PlGen:jd      R          ;
                +Pl+Acc:jd      K          ;
                +Pl+Ill:jdda    K          ;
                +Pl+Loc:jn      K          ;
       +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:jnna    K          ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:js      K          ; ! !SOUTH
                +Pl+Com:jgujn   K          ;
             +Pl+Com/Sh:j%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
                +Pl+Gen:jddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                +Pl+Acc:jddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                +Pl+Ill:jddás%> NPxC       ;
                +Pl+Loc:jnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                +Pl+Com:jddi%>  NPxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON LEXMUSH !!= * __@CODE@__ derived verbs on -muš
 +N: MUSH ;

LEXICON MUSH
 @C.NeedNoun@: MUSHcase ;

LEXICON MUSHcase   !!= * __@CODE@__ Deverbal nouns
                                     JOHTOLAT0 ;
                           :a        MUSSHA    ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K         ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K         ;

LEXICON MUSSHA !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:%>                                     NPx12Vvowch ;
  < "+N":%> "+Sg":0 "+Nom":0 "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3Vvowch  ;
    +Ess:%>n                                    K           ;
    +Ess:%>n%>                                  NPxC        ;
        :%>                                     LASJOBL     ;

LEXICON EAMOSH   !!= * __@CODE@__ superlatives, western
 +N@C.NeedNoun@:0@C.NeedNoun@ EAMOSHcase ; ! We want the POS tag before the flag
                                          ! diacritic to avoid problems for the
                                          ! tag reordering regex.

LEXICON EAMOSHcase   !!= * __@CODE@__  Deverbal nouns
                     +Sg+Nom:X4         K          ;
                  +Cmp/SgNom:X4         R          ;
  +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá   K          ;
  +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi   K          ;
                        +Ess:X4in       K          ;
                     +Sg+Gen:X2a        K          ;
    +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen:X2         K          ;
                     +Sg+Acc:X2a        K          ;
!   +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom/acc:X2         K          ;
                     +Pl+Nom:X2at       K          ;
            +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X2ak       K          ; ! !Skániid dialect
                     +Sg+Ill:X2ij       K          ;
                     +Sg+Loc:X2is       K          ;
      +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X2in       K          ; ! !SOUTH
                     +Sg+Com:X2ijn      K          ;
            +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X2ijnna    K          ;
                     +Pl+Gen:X2ijd      K          ;
                     +Pl+Acc:X2ijd      K          ;
                     +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda    K          ;
                     +Pl+Loc:X2ijn      K          ;
            +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:X2ijnna    K          ;
                     +Pl+Com:X2ijgujn   K          ;
                  +Pl+Com/Sh:X2ij%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
                     +Sg+Nom:X2         NPxC       ;
                     +Sg+Gen:X2         NPxC       ;
                     +Sg+Acc:X2         NPxC       ;
                     +Sg+Ill:X2asa%>    NPxVvowch  ;
                     +Sg+Loc:X2istti%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +Sg+Com:X2ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
!                    +Pl+Nom:X2ijddá%>  NPx1V      ;
                     +Pl+Gen:X2ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +Pl+Acc:X2ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +Pl+Ill:X2ijddás%> NPxC       ;
                     +Pl+Loc:X2ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +Pl+Com:X2ijddi%>  NPxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON AMOSH   !!= * __@CODE@__ superlatives, eastern
 @C.NeedNoun@: AMOSHcase ;

LEXICON AMOSHcase !!= * __@CODE@__
                            +N:         MALLAS-    ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:         K          ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:         R          ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K          ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K          ;
                        +N+Ess:in       K          ;
                     +N+Sg+Nom:00       NPxC       ;
                     +N+Sg+Gen:a        K          ;
    +N+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom/gen:         K          ;
                     +N+Sg+Gen:         NPxC       ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:a        K          ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:         K          ;
                     +N+Sg+Acc:         NPxC       ;
                     +N+Pl+Nom:at       K          ;
            +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:ak       K          ; ! !Skániid dialect
                     +N+Sg+Ill:asa%>    NPxVvowch  ;
!                    +N+Pl+Nom:ijddá%>  NPx1V      ;
                     +N+Sg+Ill:ij       K          ;
                     +N+Sg+Loc:is       K          ;
      +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in       K          ; ! !SOUTH
                     +N+Sg+Com:ijn      K          ;
            +N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:ijnna    K          ;
                     +N+Pl+Gen:ijd      K          ;
                     +N+Pl+Acc:ijd      K          ;
                     +N+Pl+Ill:ijdda    K          ;
                     +N+Pl+Loc:ijn      K          ;
            +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:ijnna    K          ;
      +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:ijs      K          ; ! !SOUTH
                     +N+Pl+Com:ijgujn   K          ;
                  +N+Pl+Com/Sh:ij%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
                     +N+Sg+Loc:istti%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Sg+Com:ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
!                      +Pl+Nom:ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ; !^P^
                     +N+Pl+Gen:ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Pl+Acc:ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Pl+Ill:ijddás%> NPxC       ;
                     +N+Pl+Loc:ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Pl+Com:ijddi%>  NPxPlComV1 ;


!! !!Deverbal nouns
