src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
ILO-soahpamuš+CmpN/First:ILO-soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
Ilo-soahpamuš+CmpN/First:Ilo-soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
ON-soahpamuš+CmpN/First:ON-soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
Soria% Moria-cealkámuš+CmpN/First:Soria% Moria-cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
LEXICON Eahpe_Noun
eahpeluohttámušcealkámuš+CmpN/First:eahpe#luohttámuš#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
LEXICON Noun
addámuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:addámušš LEXMUSH "giving N" ;
akšuvdnadutkamuš:akšuvdna#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
alimusriektecealkámuš:alimus#riekte#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
atnámuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:atnámušš LEXMUSH ;
sierravuodjinohcamuš:sierra#vuodjin#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
ballamuš:ballamušš LEXMUSH ;
bargamuš:bargamušš LEXMUSH ;
bargoeaktosoahpamuš:bargo#eakto#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
bargosoahpamuš:bargo#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
beaiveborramuš:beaive#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
bealkámuš:bealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
bievlavuodjenohcamuš:bievla#vuodjen#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
biilaboaldámuš:biila#boaldámušš LEXMUSH ;
birgemuš:birgemušš LEXMUSH ;
bissehansoahpamuš:bissehan#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
bivdosoahpamuš:bivdo#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
boaibmumuš:boaibmumušš LEXMUSH ;
boaldámuš:boaldámušš LEXMUSH ;
boazoguohtonsoahpamuš:boazo#guohton#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
bohčámuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:bohčámušš LEXMUSH ;
bonjadamoš AMOSH ;
bonjadeamoš:bonjadeapmo7š EAMOSH ;
borramuš:borramušš LEXMUSH ;
buotnjomuš:buotnjo7mušš LEXMUSH ;
buođđumuš:buođđumušš LEXMUSH ;
báhčimuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:báhči7mušš LEXMUSH ;
báikedovdamuš:báike#dovdamušš LEXMUSH ;
bálkámáksámuš:bálká#máksámušš LEXMUSH ;
kulttordutkamuš:kulttor#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
servvodatsoahpamuš:servvodat#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
bátneruš:bátne7rušš LEXMUSH ;
cealkámuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
muhtorboaldámuš:muhtor#boaldámušš LEXMUSH ;
cuiggodamoš AMOSH ;
cuiggodeamoš:cuiggodeapmo7š EAMOSH ;
cuoigumuš:cuoigumušš LEXMUSH ;
dahkamuš:dahkamušš LEXMUSH ;
láhkaaddicealkámuš:láhka#addi#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
dearvvašvuođadutkamuš:dearvvašvuođa#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
vearrosoahpamuš:vearro#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
divodamoš AMOSH ;
divodeamoš:divodeapmo7š EAMOSH ;
divvumuš:divvumušš LEXMUSH ;
doaivumuš:doaivumušš LEXMUSH ;
doarjjacealkámuš:doarjja#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
doarjjaohcamuš:doarjja#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
dovdamuš:dovdamušš LEXMUSH ;
duopmocealkámuš:duopmo#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
dutkanrahčamuš:dutkan#rahčamušš LEXMUSH ;
dáhttosoahpamuš:dáhtto#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
dálkkasjuhkamuš:dálkkas#juhkamušš LEXMUSH ;
nálledutkamuš:nálle#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
olmmošdutkamuš:olmmoš#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
eahkesborramuš:eahkes#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
prinsihppacealkámuš:prinsihppa#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
eallámuš:eallámušš LEXMUSH ;
ealáhusáigumuš:ealáhus#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
eamiálbmotsoahpamuš:eami#álbmot#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
eanančujuhancealkámuš:eanan#čujuhan#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
eatnančujuhancealkámuš:eatnan#čujuhan#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
fiberborramuš:fiber#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
fiiberborramuš:fiiber#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
fáktemuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:fáktemušš LEXMUSH ;
galgamuš:galgamušš LEXMUSH ;
geasseborramuš:geasse#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
prošeaktaohcamuš:prošeakta#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
giitimuš:giiti7mušš LEXMUSH ;
gillámuš:gillámušš LEXMUSH ;
jahtamuš:jahtamušš LEXMUSH ;
guohtumuš:guohtumušš LEXMUSH ;
guossohamoš AMOSH ;
guossoheamoš:guossoheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
gálgamuš:gálgamušš LEXMUSH ;
huškumuš:huškumušš LEXMUSH ;
iešluohttámuš:ieš#luohttámušš LEXMUSH ;
iskamuš:iskamušš LEXMUSH ;
iđđesborramuš:iđđes#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
joksanáigumuš:joksan#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
komiteasmiehttamuš:komitea#smiehttamušš LEXMUSH ;
lasihamoš AMOSH ;
lasiheamoš:lasiheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
lahttoohcamuš:lahtto#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
lohkanbadjedutkamuš:lohkan#badje#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
láibeborramuš:láibe#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
ruskaborramuš:ruska#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
lohkanbadjebargodutkamuš:lohkan#badje#bargo#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
uštimuš:uštimušš LEXMUSH ;
muhttámuš:muhttámušš LEXMUSH ;
muitalamoš AMOSH ;
muitaleamoš:muitaleapmo7š EAMOSH ;
muosáhamoš AMOSH ;
muosáheamoš:muosáheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
mánáidsoahpamuš:mánáid9#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
navdámuš:navdámušš LEXMUSH ;
nákkosgirjedutkamuš:nákkos#girje#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
oaidnimuš:oaidnimušš LEXMUSH ;
oastámuš:oastámušš LEXMUSH ;
márkandovdamuš:márkan#dovdamušš LEXMUSH ;
ovttasbargosoahpamuš:ovttas#bargo#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
politiijadutkamuš:politiija#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
reabbácealkámuš:reabbá#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
regulerenáigumuš:reguleren#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
rihkkumuš:rihkkumušš LEXMUSH ;
rádjasoahpamuš:rádja#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
ráhkkanamoš AMOSH ;
ráhkkaneamoš:ráhkkaneapmo7š EAMOSH ;
seastámuš:seastámušš LEXMUSH ;
rádjájohkasoahpamuš:rádjá#johka#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
soahtamuš:soahtamušš LEXMUSH ;
stuorámusáigumuš:stuorámus#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
sálašdutkamuš:sálaš#dutkamušš LEXMUSH ;
sárdnumuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:sárdnumušš LEXMUSH ;
stipeandaohcamuš:stipeanda#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
veadjámuš:veadjámušš LEXMUSH ;
viežžamuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:viežžamušš LEXMUSH ;
vuhtiiváldámuš:vuhtii#váldámušš LEXMUSH ;
vuorjamuš:vuorjamušš LEXMUSH ;
kulttoráigumuš:kulttor#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
váidámuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:váidámušš LEXMUSH ;
váikkuhamoš AMOSH ;
váikkuheamoš:váikkuheapmo7š EAMOSH ;
váldomoaitámuš:váldo#moaitámušš LEXMUSH ;
priváhtaskuvlaohcamuš:priváhta#skuvla#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
áigumuš:áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
átnumuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:átnumušš LEXMUSH ;
luondduborramuš:luonddu#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
ruvkeáigumuš:ruvke#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
čuovvumuš:čuovvumušš LEXMUSH ;
virgelohpeohcamuš:virge#lohpe#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
